Wyoming statutes. Title 29 Liens
Chapter 9 Miscellaneous Liens

Effective date. —

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 29-9-101.
Lien of state on realty of debtor.

The amount of every account audited, adjusted and found due to the state including penalties and interest is a lien upon the real property of the person charged with the debt. The lien shall be in effect from the time suit commences for the recovery of the debt.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 1.

§ 29-9-102.
Lien of attorneys on papers and monies of clients.

For professional services performed on behalf of a client, an attorney shall have a lien for compensation due him from the time of giving notice of the lien. The attorney’s lien attaches upon:

Any papers or money of his client which have come into his possession;

Money due his client and in the possession of an adverse party.

Notice as required by subsection (a) of this section to be given to any person against whom the lien is asserted shall be given by certified mail, return receipt requested.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 1.

Improper filing of attorney’s lien. —

Attorney violated professional conduct rules and was suspended for 30 days for misrepresentations in filing a lien statement where the lien was filed under a statute that applied to improvements to real property, and no notice was provided. Moreover, the attorney failed to make any limitation to exclude the assets of a spouse, and she attached an inaccurate and unreasonable billing statement to the sworn lien statement that was filed with a county clerk. Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Casper, 2014 WY 22, 318 P.3d 790,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 2014).